Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202048-1228
Act, how cited.

Sections 48-1228 to 48-1236 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Wage Payment and Collection Act.

Laws 1977, LB 220A, § 1;

Laws 2007, LB255, § 1;

Laws 2014, LB560, § 1;

Laws 2020, LB1016, § 2.

The Nebraska Wage Payment and Collection Act does not prohibit employers from discharging employees, and it does not provide employees with any substantive rights. Coffey v. Planet Group, 287 Neb. 834, 845 N.W.2d 255 (2014).

The Nebraska Wage Payment and Collection Act does not represent a very clear mandate of public policy which would warrant recognition of an exception to the employment-at-will doctrine. Malone v. American Bus. Info., 262 Neb. 733, 634 N.W.2d 788 (2001).

Nebraska Wage Payment and Collection Act does not apply to severance payment which becomes due upon termination of employment. Babb v. United Food & Commercial Workers Local 271, 233 Neb. 826, 448 N.W.2d 168 (1989).

If an employer and employee agree upon a bonus to be paid upon certain conditions and the conditions are fulfilled, the bonus is wages under the Nebraska Wage Payment and Collection Act. Knutson v. Snyder Industries, Inc., 231 Neb. 374, 436 N.W.2d 496 (1989).

The Nebraska Wage Payment and Collection Act applies only to actions to recover wages due an employee for labor or services performed for an employer. Heimbouch v. Victorio Ins. Serv., Inc., 220 Neb. 279, 369 N.W.2d 620 (1985).